District of Columbia statutes.
31-2710

Judicial proceedings to contest actions of Commissioner.

Any person, firm or corporation aggrieved by any order, ruling, proceeding, or action of the Commissioner may contest the validity of such order, ruling, proceeding, or action in any court of competent jurisdiction by appeal or through any other appropriate proceedings, as provided under § 31-2502.44 [repealed].

History

May 20, 1948, 62 Stat. 247, ch. 324, § 10
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268,§ 10, 44 DCR 1730
Mar. 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-81, § 30(b), 45 DCR 745

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-1710.
1973 Ed., § 35-1510.

Editor's Notes

Department of Insurance abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-2701.